Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202657-1614
Storage facility; commission; duties; effect on jurisdiction of Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.

(1) The commission shall take action to ensure that a storage facility does not cause pollution or create a nuisance. For the purposes of this provision and in applying other laws, carbon dioxide streams stored, and which remain in storage under a commission permit, are not a pollutant and do not constitute a nuisance.

(2) The commission's authority in subsection (1) of this section does not limit the jurisdiction held by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment. Nothing else in the Nebraska Geologic Storage of Carbon Dioxide Act limits the jurisdiction held by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.

(3) The commission shall take action to ensure that substances that compromise the objectives of the act or the integrity of a storage reservoir do not enter a storage reservoir.

(4) The commission shall take action to ensure that carbon dioxide does not escape from a storage facility.

Laws 2021, LB650, § 14;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 319.